Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SPECIAL EDUCATION INITIAL AID ADJUSTMENT; DULUTH.new text end new text begin (a) For fiscal year 2026 and later, special education initial aid for Independent School District No. 709, Duluth, must be increased each year by $500,000 to reflect changes not included when the 2016 special education base was established. new text end new text begin (b) Each year, the Department of Education must add the amount in paragraph (a) to the special education initial aid computed under Minnesota Statutes, section 125A.76, subdivision 2a, for Independent School District No. 709, Duluth. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for special education aid for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SPECIAL EDUCATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Special education base adjustment. new text end new text begin For the special education aid base adjustment under section 1 for Independent School District No. 709, Duluth: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 500,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Supplemental special education aid. new text end new text begin For supplemental special education aid for Independent School District No. 709, Duluth: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 1,000,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end